Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Forfeiture of Charter

6-52-301. Requisites for forfeiture.

If any municipal corporation with a population of one hundred (100) inhabitants or fewer according to the latest federal census fails to exercise its corporate powers as described in § 6-52-302, then it shall, as a municipal corporation, forfeit its charter.

Such forfeiture shall become effective upon the issuance of a court decree to that effect as prescribed in § 6-52-303.

Acts 1983, ch. 116, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1983, ch. 116, § 5 provided that this part shall apply to any municipal corporation that has failed to exercise its corporate powers as described in § 6-52-302 on or after April 20, 1983.

By order entered April 28, 1983, in the Chancery Court for Madison County, the city charter of Denmark, Tennessee was forfeited pursuant to this part.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

6-52-302. Failure to exercise corporate powers.

“Failure to exercise corporate powers” under § 6-52-301 shall include either subdivisions (1)(A)-(C) combined, or subdivision (2) alone:

Failure to elect a mayor or legislative body, or both, for more than one (1) year after the time fixed for such elections; and

Failure to levy and collect any municipal ad valorem property taxes for a period of three (3) successive years; and

Failure to expend any funds for municipal purposes or adopt a budget for municipal expenditures for a period of three (3) successive years; or

Failure to hold any municipal elections for more than twenty (20) years.

Acts 1983, ch. 116, § 2.

6-52-303. Procedure.

Any five (5) qualified voters of a municipal corporation that has failed to exercise municipal powers as described in § 6-52-302 may petition the chancery court or court of record with equity jurisdiction in the county in which the municipal corporation is located to declare the charter of the municipal corporation forfeited.

A hearing shall be held not more than sixty (60) days after the filing of the petition to determine whether the municipal corporation meets all the conditions set forth in § 6-52-302. If the court determines that such conditions are met, then it shall issue a decree declaring the charter of the municipal corporation forfeited.

Such decree shall be transmitted by certified mail by the clerk of the court to the secretary of state who shall attach the decree to the charter of the municipal corporation and note its dissolution on all records relating to the municipal corporation. Failure of the secretary of state to make such notations shall have no effect on the forfeiture.

Acts 1983, ch. 116, § 3.

6-52-304. Outstanding debts — Disposition of municipal property.

If there are any outstanding debts in the form of bonds or otherwise owed by the municipal corporation at the time of forfeiture of the charter, the county legislative body of the county in which the municipal corporation is located is authorized to levy a special tax within the territory embraced within the corporate limit of the former corporation for the purposes set forth in § 6-52-101. The collection and disposition of such a tax shall be pursuant to § 6-52-102.

If a municipal corporation that has forfeited its charter pursuant to this part retains any property or assets, or both, that property or assets, or both shall first be applied to any indebtedness owed by the municipal corporation. If any such property or assets, or both remain after the payment of any indebtedness, then such property or assets, or both shall become the property or assets, or both of the county in which the municipal corporation is located.

Acts 1983, ch. 116, § 4.